Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.070

Taking motor vehicle without permission in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree if he or she, without the permission of the owner or person entitled to possession, intentionally takes or drives away an automobile or motor vehicle, whether propelled by steam, electricity, or internal combustion engine, that is the property of another, and he or she:

(a) Alters the motor vehicle for the purpose of changing its appearance or primary identification, including obscuring, removing, or changing the manufacturer's serial number or the vehicle identification number plates;

(b) Removes, or participates in the removal of, parts from the motor vehicle with the intent to sell the parts;

(c) Exports, or attempts to export, the motor vehicle across state lines or out of the United States for profit;

(d) Intends to sell the motor vehicle; or

(e) Is engaged in a conspiracy and the central object of the conspiratorial agreement is the theft of motor vehicles for sale to others for profit or is engaged in a conspiracy and has solicited a juvenile to participate in the theft of a motor vehicle.

(2) Taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 2007 c 199 s 16; 2003 c 53 s 72; 2002 c 324 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.56.070.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2007 c 199: See notes following RCW 9A.56.065.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Study and report—2002 c 324: "The sentencing guidelines commission shall study the impact of the sentencing changes in this act upon the incidence of the crime of taking a motor vehicle without permission. By December 2004, the commission shall submit a report to the governor and the legislature. The report shall address:

(1) Whether the creation of the crime of taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first degree and the increased penalties for that new crime have resulted in a reduction in the number of convictions for taking a motor vehicle without permission in the first or second degree; and

(2) Whether there are other actions, either civil or criminal, that could have the effect of further decreasing the incidence of these crimes, including but not limited to: The revocation of driving privileges, double scoring of prior convictions, or increasing penalties for juveniles." [ 2002 c 324 s 4.]